District of Columbia statutes.
34-2409.03

Cessation upon introduction of water.

Whenever the water is introduced, in conformity with law, into any building or premises, the fireplug tax thereon shall cease.

R.S., D.C., § 207
1981 Ed., § 43-1536.
1973 Ed., § 43-1527.